Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF3429.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin [216C.332] BUILDING ENERGY PERFORMANCE STANDARDS. new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Definitions. new text end new text begin (a) For the purposes of this section, the following terms have the meanings given. new text end new text begin (b) "Building type" means a category of buildings similar in design, function, and energy use. new text end new text begin (c) "Covered building" has the meaning given to "covered property" in section 216C.331, subdivision 1. new text end new text begin (d) "Energy" has the meaning given in section 216C.331, subdivision 1. new text end new text begin (e) "Energy Star Portfolio Manager" has the meaning given in section 216C.331, subdivision 1. new text end new text begin (f) "Energy use intensity" or "EUI" has the meaning given in section 216C.331, subdivision 1. new text end new text begin (g) "Final performance standard" means the numeric value of a performance metric that covered buildings must meet by 2045. new text end new text begin (h) "Financial distress" means that a covered building: new text end new text begin (1) is the subject of a qualified tax lien sale or public auction due to property tax arrearages; new text end new text begin (2) is controlled by a court-appointed receiver based on financial problems; new text end new text begin (3) is owned by a financial institution through default by the borrower; new text end new text begin (4) has been acquired by deed in lieu of foreclosure; or new text end new text begin (5) has a senior mortgage that is subject to a notice of default. new text end new text begin (i) "Greenhouse gas emissions" means emissions of carbon dioxide, methane, nitrous oxide, hydrofluorocarbons, perfluorocarbons, and sulfur hexafluoride resulting from energy used at a building site. new text end new text begin (j) "Interim performance metric" means the numeric value of a performance metric that covered properties must meet every five years until 2045. new text end new text begin (k) "Multifamily affordable housing" means a covered building that: new text end new text begin (1) contains five or more dwelling units; new text end new text begin (2) meets the eligibility standards established by the commissioner under section 216B.2403, subdivision 5, paragraph (e), for multifamily buildings to participate in energy conservation programs provided to low-income households; and new text end new text begin (3) receives or received government financing or financial assistance at the county, state, or federal level. new text end new text begin (l) "Owner" means an individual or entity that possesses the title to a covered building or an agent that the individual or entity has authorized to act on behalf of the individual or entity. new text end new text begin (m) "Total floor area" has the meaning given in section 216C.331, subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Establishment. new text end new text begin The commissioner must establish and maintain a building energy performance standards program. The purpose of the program is to reduce: new text end new text begin (1) the amount of energy used to (i) heat and cool buildings, and (ii) provide other energy services; and new text end new text begin (2) greenhouse gas emissions from covered buildings by 90 percent from a 2005 baseline by 2045. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Classification of covered buildings. new text end new text begin For the purposes of this section, a covered building is classified as follows: new text end new text begin Class new text end new text begin Ownership new text end new text begin Total floor area (square feet) new text end new text begin 1 new text end new text begin City, state, county, school district, metropolitan council new text end new text begin 100,000 or more new text end new text begin 2 new text end new text begin City, state, county, school district, metropolitan council new text end new text begin 50,000 to 99,999 new text end new text begin 3 new text end new text begin Private new text end new text begin 100,000 or more new text end new text begin 4 new text end new text begin Private new text end new text begin 50,000 or more new text end new text begin Subd. 4. new text end new text begin Final EUI standards; establishment. new text end new text begin (a) No later than January 1, 2026, the commissioner must establish final EUI standards for all covered buildings. The commissioner must establish final EUI standards at a level at which, if the EUI standards are met by all covered buildings, the aggregated greenhouse gas emissions from all covered buildings is reduced by 90 percent by 2045 from a 2005 baseline. new text end new text begin (b) When establishing final EUI standards, the commissioner may utilize the building types used in the Energy Star Portfolio Manager benchmarking tool or other building types. new text end new text begin (c) Class 1 covered buildings must meet the final EUI standard no later than 2042. Class 2 covered buildings must meet the final EUI standard no later than 2043. Class 3 covered buildings must meet the final EUI standard no later than 2044. Class 4 covered buildings must meet the final EUI standard no later than 2045. new text end new text begin (d) The final EUI standard established for a covered property containing more than a single building type must be calculated on a pro rata basis based on the square footage of each building type. new text end new text begin Subd. 5. new text end new text begin Interim EUI standards; establishment. new text end new text begin The commissioner must establish interim EUI standards that each covered building must meet every five years, beginning in 2028 for class 1 covered buildings and continuing until 2045 for class 4 covered buildings. The interim EUI standards must be calculated on a straight-line trajectory with respect to the final EUI standards so that covered buildings meeting the interim EUI standards demonstrate steady progress toward the final EUI standards in equal increments. Each owner must submit a report to the commissioner, on a form prescribed by the commissioner, demonstrating the covered building's progress toward meeting the interim EUI standards. new text end new text begin Subd. 6. new text end new text begin EUI standards; extensions; exemptions; adjustments. new text end new text begin (a) An owner may request the commissioner to issue the owner an extension, exemption, or adjustment to an interim or final EUI standard for a covered building. The commissioner may approve the request if the commissioner determines that: new text end new text begin (1) the covered building is experiencing financial distress or is likely to experience financial distress within the next 12 months; new text end new text begin (2) the covered building: new text end new text begin (i) has been less than 50 percent occupied; new text end new text begin (ii) does not have a certificate of occupancy or a temporary certificate of occupancy; new text end new text begin (iii) was issued a demolition permit that remains current; or new text end new text begin (iv) received no energy services for at least 30 days; or new text end new text begin (3) meeting the EUI standard is not in the public interest. new text end new text begin (b) If an owner submits a request under this subdivision less than one year before the deadline for the applicable EUI standard, the owner may be subject to a penalty of up to $1,000, as determined by the commissioner. new text end new text begin (c) An owner of multifamily affordable housing is exempt from the requirements of this section until the owner refinances the building after the effective date of this act, at which point the multifamily affordable housing is subject to the next sequential EUI standard that covered buildings are required to meet under subdivision 4 or 5, as applicable. new text end new text begin (d) An owner is exempt from the requirements of this section with respect to a covered building that the commissioner determines is subject to an EUI or other energy-related standard required by the state or a political subdivision that is more stringent than an EUI standard established under this section. new text end new text begin (e) An owner must provide information requested by the commissioner in order to evaluate a request made under this subdivision. The commissioner must treat information an owner provides under this subdivision as not public data under chapter 13. new text end new text begin Subd. 7. new text end new text begin Interface with utility conservation programs. new text end new text begin Nothing in this section limits the ability of a public utility or municipal utility to offer programs to covered buildings, or to claim energy savings resulting from the offered programs, through the utility's energy conservation and optimization plans approved by the commissioner under section 216B.2403 or 216B.241. new text end new text begin Subd. 8. new text end new text begin Public buildings; portfolio option. new text end new text begin An owner of multiple class 1 or class 2 buildings may, after receiving the commissioner's approval, elect to meet an applicable EUI standard by reducing energy use in one or more of the owner's class 1 or class 2 buildings by an amount that is equal to or greater than the energy use that would have been reduced had each of the owner's class 1 and class 2 buildings met the applicable EUI standard. new text end new text begin Subd. 9. new text end new text begin Building Performance Advisory Committee. new text end new text begin (a) No later than August 15, 2025, the commissioner must establish and make appointments to a Building Performance Advisory Committee consisting of representatives from the following entities and professions: new text end new text begin (1) the commissioner, or the commissioner's designee, as a nonvoting member; new text end new text begin (2) a public or municipal utility providing natural gas service to Minnesota retail customers; new text end new text begin (3) a public or municipal utility providing electricity service to Minnesota retail customers; new text end new text begin (4) an entity that provides energy efficiency measures to covered buildings; new text end new text begin (5) an entity that provides renewable energy facilities to covered buildings; new text end new text begin (6) a professional who designs covered buildings; new text end new text begin (7) an engineer experienced in operating energy systems in covered buildings; new text end new text begin (8) a manager of operations for covered buildings; new text end new text begin (9) a labor union representative of workers who operate or service covered buildings; new text end new text begin (10) an owner of a covered building containing residences for families; new text end new text begin (11) an owner of a covered building providing affordable housing for families; new text end new text begin (12) a tenant of multifamily affordable housing; new text end new text begin (13) a nonprofit organization that addresses climate change, decarbonization, or green building issues; new text end new text begin (14) a nonprofit organization that addresses environmental justice issues; new text end new text begin (15) an expert on sustainable buildings from the University of Minnesota's Center for Sustainable Building Research; and new text end new text begin (16) a local government unit. new text end new text begin (b) The Building Performance Advisory Committee must: new text end new text begin (1) advise the commissioner on implementing and operating this section; new text end new text begin (2) recommend interim and final EUI standards for different building types; and new text end new text begin (3) recommend procedures for exemptions, extensions, and adjustments the commissioner may grant under subdivision 6. new text end new text begin (c) The advisory committee must elect a chair by majority vote at the advisory committee's initial meeting. The advisory committee must meet quarterly. Additional meetings may be held at the call of the chair. The department must serve as staff to the advisory committee. new text end new text begin (d) Advisory committee members other than state employees are governed by section 15.059. new text end new text begin Subd. 10. new text end new text begin Penalties. new text end new text begin (a) An owner whose covered building fails to meet an interim or final EUI standard by the date required, and who has not received a valid extension, exemption, or adjustment from the commissioner under subdivision 6, must make a compliance payment to the commissioner under this subdivision. new text end new text begin (b) Except as provided in paragraph (c), an owner whose covered building fails to meet an EUI standard must pay to the commissioner a penalty, as determined by the commissioner, of up to $....... for each 1,000 British thermal units consumed by the covered building that exceed the EUI standard. The maximum penalty imposed under this paragraph or paragraph (c) must increase over time at the same rate as that of the estimate of the social cost of carbon dioxide emissions most recently adopted by the commission under section 216B.2422, subdivision 3. new text end new text begin (c) An owner may, with the commissioner's approval, elect to be excused from paying a penalty imposed under paragraph (b). An owner who makes the election under this paragraph and fails to meet the next scheduled EUI standard for the same covered building must pay to the commissioner an amount equal to ... percent of the earlier penalty imposed on the covered building, in addition to a payment for failing to meet the subsequent EUI standard. new text end new text begin (d) A compliance payment must be made under this subdivision each year or portion of a year during which a covered building fails to meet an EUI standard. new text end new text begin (e) When determining the amount of a compliance payment under this subdivision, the commissioner must consider: new text end new text begin (1) the magnitude of the amount by which the covered building's performance exceeds the level of the applicable EUI standard; new text end new text begin (2) the length of time over which the covered building has failed to meet the applicable EUI standard; new text end new text begin (3) the assessed value of the covered building; and new text end new text begin (4) the total number of EUI standards the covered building has failed to meet over time. new text end new text begin Subd. 11. new text end new text begin Technical and financial assistance hub. new text end new text begin The department must contract with a nonprofit organization with extensive experience implementing energy efficiency programs in buildings to operate a building performance technical and financial assistance hub. The hub must assist owners to comply with this section by: new text end new text begin (1) offering technical assistance directly to owners regarding energy-saving reduction measures and strategies; new text end new text begin (2) connecting owners with other sources of technical assistance, including other covered building owners who have successfully reduced energy use; and new text end new text begin (3) making owners aware of sources of financial assistance, including tax credits, that are offered by utilities or available through programs administered by local, state, and federal government entities to support implementing energy-saving measures. new text end new text begin Subd. 12. new text end new text begin Program implementation. new text end new text begin The commissioner may contract with an independent third party to implement any or all of the commissioner's duties required under this section. The commissioner must assist owners to access the technical and financial assistance hub established under subdivision 11 and the building energy performance improvement grant program established under subdivision 14 to reduce energy use from the owners' covered properties through outreach and training. The commissioner must begin informing owners of this section's requirements in 2025 as part of outreach activities required under the energy benchmarking program under section 216C.331. new text end new text begin Subd. 13. new text end new text begin Account established. new text end new text begin (a) A building energy performance standards program account is established in the special revenue account in the state treasury. The commissioner must credit to the account appropriations and transfers made to the account and penalties collected under this section. Earnings, including interest, dividends, and any other earnings arising from assets of the account, must be credited to the account. Money remaining in the account at the end of a fiscal year does not cancel to the general fund but remains in the account. The commissioner must manage the account. new text end new text begin (b) Money in the account that is not collected from penalties is appropriated to the commissioner and must be used only to reimburse the reasonable expenses incurred by the department to administer the building energy performance standards program under this section. new text end new text begin (c) Money in the account collected from penalties under subdivision 10 is appropriated to the commissioner and must only be used to award building energy performance improvement grants under subdivision 14. new text end new text begin Subd. 14. new text end new text begin Building energy performance improvement grants. new text end new text begin (a) A building energy performance improvement grant program is established in the department to provide financial assistance to eligible applicants to make improvements that reduce energy use in order to achieve the EUI standards established under this section. new text end new text begin (b) An application for a grant under this section must be made to the commissioner on a form developed by the commissioner. The application must be accompanied by documentation, as required by the commissioner: new text end new text begin (1) that the applicant is the owner of a covered building or the owner's agent; new text end new text begin (2) that the applicant has had an energy assessment, conducted of the covered building within the previous 24 months by a qualified person as determined by the commissioner, indicating the opportunities to reduce the covered building's energy use; new text end new text begin (3) indicating the total energy and greenhouse gas emission savings expected from the proposed improvements; and new text end new text begin (4) indicating the total cost to purchase and install the improvements. new text end new text begin (c) The commissioner must develop administrative procedures governing the application and grant award processes. new text end new text begin (d) The commissioner may, in consultation with the Building Performance Advisory Committee, establish preferences for applicants seeking grants for certain building types or energy-reduction measures. new text end new text begin (e) When awarding grants under this subdivision, the commissioner must give priority to applications that propose to: new text end new text begin (1) reduce energy use in multifamily affordable housing; or new text end new text begin (2) achieve reductions in energy use greater than or sooner than is required by the applicable EUI standard. new text end new text begin (f) Fifty percent of a grant awarded under this subdivision must be paid to an applicant prior to the commencement of work. The balance of a grant awarded under this subdivision must be paid when the work supported by the grant is completed. new text end new text begin (g) The commissioner must modify program requirements under this section when necessary to align with comparable federal programs administered by the department under the federal Inflation Reduction Act of 2022, Public Law 117-189. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end Sec. 2. new text begin APPROPRIATION.new text end new text begin $....... in fiscal year 2026 is appropriated from the general fund to the commissioner of commerce to administer and enforce the building energy performance standards program under Minnesota Statutes, section 216C.332. Of this amount: new text end new text begin (1) up to $....... may be used to award grants to applicants under the building energy performance improvement grant program established under Minnesota Statutes, section 216C.332, subdivision 14; and new text end new text begin (2) up to $....... may be used to fund the technical and financial assistance hub established under Minnesota Statutes, section 216C.332, subdivision 11. new text end